New Jersey, session 221, A4932.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A provider of early intervention services made available pursuant to P.L.1993, c.309 (C.26:1A-36.6 et seq.) shall, on or before September 1 of each year, provide: (1) the Department of Education a list of the names and ages of all eligible infants and toddlers receiving early intervention services from the provider; and (2) each childs district of residence a list of the names and ages of all eligible infants and toddlers receiving early intervention services from the provider. b.  No later than 120 days prior to the third birthday of a child receiving early intervention services, the childs provider of early intervention services shall notify the childs district of residence and the Department of Education that the child, upon the childs third birthday, will reach the age of eligibility for services under Part B of the "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act," 20 U.S.C. s.1400 et seq. The notification shall provide the following information to the district: (1) documentation of any additional information necessary for the district to ensure the continuity of services from the Part C to the Part B program under the "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act," 20 U.S.C. s.1400 et seq. for eligible individuals; (2) a copy of the most recent evaluation and assessments of the child and the family; and (3) a copy of the childs most recent individualized family service plan. c.  Notification pursuant to subsection b. of this section shall comply with all State and federal laws and regulations governing parental consent and the opt-out policy permitting a parent to object to the disclosure of personally identifiable information. d.  The Department of Health, in consultation with the Department of Education, shall establish appropriate penalties for a provider of early intervention services that fails to comply with the provisions of this act. Penalties may include, but shall not be limited to: (1) revocation of current funding received from the State, including, but not limited to, grant funding; (2) the nullification of current contracts between the vendor and any State entity; (3) restrictions on applying for or receiving future State funding; (4) restrictions on entering into future contracts with a State entity; (5) loss of status as an approved provider of early intervention services under the New Jersey Early Intervention System; and (6) any other penalties deemed appropriate by the Department of Health, in consultation with the Department of Education. 2.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment.